tools/snowball/algorithms/spanish.sbl
// Spanish stemmer, from the Snowball project: https://snowballstem.org/algorithms/spanish/stemmer.html
// This is spanish.sbl of Snowball 2.2.0 with the changes marked 'nlpjs-neo' below.
// Snowball is BSD licensed, see tools/snowball/LICENSE-SNOWBALL.
// Regenerate the stemmers with: pnpm stemmers

routines (
           postlude mark_regions
           RV R1 R2 R2b
           attached_pronoun
           standard_suffix
           y_verb_suffix
           verb_suffix
           residual_suffix
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( pV p1 p2 )

groupings ( v )

stringescapes {}

/* special characters */

// nlpjs-neo: by the time a word is stemmed the normalizer has taken the accents
// off, so the letters with an accent are the letters without it. The rules that
// only differed by an accent, and are now the same string, are written once.
stringdef a'   'a'  // a-acute
stringdef e'   'e'  // e-acute
stringdef i'   'i'  // i-acute
stringdef o'   'o'  // o-acute
stringdef u'   'u'  // u-acute
stringdef u"   'u'  // u-diaeresis
stringdef n~   'n'  // n-tilde

define v 'aeiou{a'}{e'}{i'}{o'}{u'}{u"}'

define mark_regions as (

    $pV = limit
    $p1 = limit
    $p2 = limit  // defaults

    do (
        ( v (non-v gopast v) or (v gopast non-v) )
        or
        ( non-v (non-v gopast v) or (v next) )
        setmark pV
    )
    do (
        gopast v gopast non-v setmark p1
        gopast v gopast non-v setmark p2
    )
)

define postlude as repeat (
    [substring] among(
        '{a'}' (<- 'a')
        '{e'}' (<- 'e')
        '{i'}' (<- 'i')
        '{o'}' (<- 'o')
        '{u'}' (<- 'u')
        // and possibly {u"}->u here, or in prelude
        ''     (next)
    ) //or next
)

backwardmode (

    define RV as $pV <= cursor
    define R1 as $p1 <= cursor
    define R2 as $p2 <= cursor
    // nlpjs-neo: the second half of the word, for the endings that are not a plain R2 (see standard_suffix)
    define R2b as $(cursor * 2 >= size)

    define attached_pronoun as (
        [substring] among(
            'me' 'se'  'sela' 'selo' 'selas' 'selos' 'la' 'le' 'lo'
            'las' 'les' 'los' 'nos'
        )
        substring RV among(
            // nlpjs-neo: the lines that took the accent off i{e'}ndo, {a'}ndo, {a'}r, {e'}r and {i'}r are gone
            'ando'
            'iendo'
            'ar' 'er' 'ir'
                       (delete)
            'yendo'    ('u' delete)
        )
    )

    define standard_suffix as (
        [substring] among(

            'anza' 'anzas'
            'ico' 'ica' 'icos' 'icas'
            'ismo' 'ismos'
            'able' 'ables'
            'ible' 'ibles'
            'ista' 'istas'
            'oso' 'osa' 'osos' 'osas'
            'amiento' 'amientos'
            'imiento' 'imientos'
            (
                R2 delete
            )
            'adora' 'ador' 'aci{o'}n'
            'adoras' 'adores' 'aciones'
            'ante' 'antes' 'ancia' 'ancias'// Note 1
            (
                R2b delete // nlpjs-neo: R2b where Snowball has R2
                try ( ['ic'] R2 delete )
            )
            'log{i'}a'
            'log{i'}as'
            (
                R2 <- 'log'
            )
            'uci{o'}n' 'uciones'
            (
                R2 <- 'u'
            )
            'encia' 'encias'
            (
                R2 <- 'ente'
            )
            'amente'
            (
                R1 delete
                try (
                    [substring] R2 delete among(
                        'iv' (['at'] R2 delete)
                        'os'
                        'ic'
                        'ad'
                    )
                )
            )
            'mente'
            (
                R2 delete
                try (
                    [substring] among(
                        'ante' // Note 1
                        'able'
                        'ible' (R2 delete)
                    )
                )
            )
            'idad'
            'idades'
            (
                R2 delete
                try (
                    [substring] among(
                        'abil'
                        'ic'
                        'iv'   (R2 delete)
                    )
                )
            )
            'iva' 'ivo'
            'ivas' 'ivos'
            (
                R2 delete
                try (
                    ['at'] R2 delete // but not a further   ['ic'] R2 delete
                )
            )
        )
    )

    define y_verb_suffix as (
        setlimit tomark pV for ([substring]) among(
            'ya' 'ye' 'yan' 'yen' 'yeron' 'yendo' 'yo' 'y{o'}'
            'yas' 'yes' 'yais' 'yamos'
                ('u' delete)
        )
    )

    define verb_suffix as (
        setlimit tomark pV for ([substring]) among(

            'en' 'es' '{e'}is' 'emos'
                (try ('u' test 'g') ] delete)

            'ar{i'}an' 'ar{i'}as' 'ar{a'}n' 'ar{a'}s' 'ar{i'}ais'
            'ar{i'}a' 'ar{e'}is' 'ar{i'}amos' 'aremos' 'ar{a'}'
            'ar{e'}'
            'er{i'}an' 'er{i'}as' 'er{a'}n' 'er{a'}s' 'er{i'}ais'
            'er{i'}a' 'er{e'}is' 'er{i'}amos' 'eremos' 'er{a'}'
            'er{e'}'
            'ir{i'}an' 'ir{i'}as' 'ir{a'}n' 'ir{a'}s' 'ir{i'}ais'
            'ir{i'}a' 'ir{e'}is' 'ir{i'}amos' 'iremos' 'ir{a'}'
            'ir{e'}'

            'aba' 'ada' 'ida' '{i'}a' 'ara' 'iera' 'ad' 'ed'
            'id' 'ase' 'iese' 'aste' 'iste' 'an' 'aban' '{i'}an'
            'aran' 'ieran' 'asen' 'iesen' 'aron' 'ieron' 'ado'
            'ido' 'ando' 'iendo' 'i{o'}' 'ar' 'er' 'ir' 'as'
            'abas' 'adas' 'idas' '{i'}as' 'aras' 'ieras' 'ases'
            'ieses' '{i'}s' '{a'}is' 'abais' '{i'}ais' 'arais'
            'ierais'  'aseis' 'ieseis' 'asteis' 'isteis' 'ados'
            'idos' 'amos' '{a'}bamos' '{i'}amos' 'imos'
            '{a'}ramos' 'i{e'}ramos' 'i{e'}semos' '{a'}semos'
            // nlpjs-neo: more endings of the future subjunctive, and the plural
            'ieremos' 'iereis' 'ieren' 'ieres' 'iere' 'aren' 'ares' 'eren'
            'esen' 'ea' 'ee' 'eo' 's' 'os' 'ios'
                (delete)
        )
    )

    define residual_suffix as (
        [substring] among(
            'os'
            'a' 'o' '{a'}' '{i'}' '{o'}'
                ( RV delete )
            'e' '{e'}'
                ( RV delete try( ['u'] test 'g' RV delete ) )
        )
    )
)

define stem as (
    do mark_regions
    backwards (
        do attached_pronoun
        do ( standard_suffix or
             y_verb_suffix or
             verb_suffix
           )
        do residual_suffix
    )
    do postlude
)

/*
    Note 1: additions of 15 Jun 2005
*/
